Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Chapter 1 General Provisions

Cross references. —

As to administration of estates of missing persons, see §§

2-12-101

through

2-12-106

.

For constitutional provision that the legislature may authorize the investment of trust funds by executors, administrators, guardians or trustees in the bonds or stocks of private corporations, see art. 3, § 38, Wyo. Const.

As to provision prohibiting special and local laws affecting estates of deceased persons, see art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.

As to gifts, escheats and forfeitures to state generally, see §§

9-5-201

to

9-5-205

.

As to exemption of trustees, administrators, executors, etc., from provisions as to licensing real estate brokers or salesmen, see §

33-28-103

.

As to property, conveyances and security transactions generally, see title 34.

As to inheritance taxes, see §

39-19-101

et seq.

Law reviews. —

See note, “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part III,” VIX Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1974).

For article, “The Wyoming Probate Code of 1980: An Analysis and Critique,” see XVI Land & Water L. Rev. 103 (1981).

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For case note, “STATUTES — Retroactive Application of the Douglas v. Newell, 719 P.2d 971,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 555

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 553 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

79 Am. Jur. 2d Wills § 1 et seq.

Liability in damages for interference with expected inheritance or gift, 22 ALR4th 1229.

Action for tortious interference with bequest as precluded by will contest remedy, 18 ALR5th 211.

95 C.J.S. Wills § 1 et seq.